Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
ARTICLE 124
NAME

Section

7-124-101. Corporate name. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 667, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 2000:

Entire section repealed, p. 990, § 109, effective July 1.

7-124-102. Reserved name. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 668, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 2000:

Entire section repealed, p. 990, § 109, effective July 1.